Connecticut, session 2026, HB05278.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than July 1, 2027,
2 the state shall provide uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage
3 under the State Fleet Insurance Policy, with limits for bodily injury or
4 death not less than one million dollars, to employees of the Department
5 of Transportation for the protection of such employees who are legally
6 entitled to recover damages from owners or operators of uninsured
7 motor vehicles and underinsured motor vehicles because of a bodily
8 injury, including death resulting therefrom, arising out of or in the
9 course of such employee's employment when such employee is required
10 to be outside of a motor vehicle.
HB5278 / File No. 190 1

HB5278 File No. 190
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
LAB Joint Favorable
HB5278 / File No. 190 2

HB5278 File No. 190
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Admin. Serv., Dept. TF - Cost None 700,000 to
1,700,000
Note: TF=Transportation Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the state to provide uninsured and underinsured
motorist coverage for Department of Transportation employees
beginning July 1, 2027. This results in a cost between $700,000 and
$1,700,000 per year depending on the quantity and severity of relevant
accidents.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
HB5278 / File No. 190 3

HB5278 File No. 190
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5278
AN ACT REQUIRING UNINSURED AND UNDERINSURED
MOTORIST COVERAGE FOR DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION EMPLOYEES.